Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9610
Official, employee, or agent of the state.

No official, employee, or agent of this state may block or attempt to block an eligible patient's access to an investigational drug, biological product, or device. Counseling, advice, or recommendations consistent with medical standards of care from a licensed health care provider is not a violation of this section.

Laws 2018, LB117, § 10.